Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.08.720

Registration, voting records—As public records—Information furnished—Restrictions, confidentiality.

(1) In the case of voter registration records received through the health benefit exchange, the department of licensing, or an agency designated under RCW 29A.08.310, the identity of the office or agency at which any particular individual registered to vote must be used only for voter registration purposes, is not available for public inspection, and shall not be disclosed to the public. Any record of a particular individual's choice not to register to vote at an office of the department of licensing or a state agency designated under RCW 29A.08.310 is not available for public inspection and any information regarding such a choice by a particular individual shall not be disclosed to the public.

(2) Disclosure of information on individuals under the age of 18 is subject to RCW 29A.08.725.

(3)(a) Subject to the restrictions of RCW 29A.08.710 and 40.24.060, and (b) of this subsection, precinct lists and current lists of registered voters are public records and must be made available for public inspection and copying under such reasonable rules and regulations as the county auditor or secretary of state may prescribe. The county auditor or secretary of state shall promptly furnish current lists of registered voters in his or her possession, at actual reproduction cost, to any person requesting such information. The lists shall not be used for the purpose of mailing or delivering any advertisement or offer for any property, establishment, organization, product, or service or for the purpose of mailing or delivering any solicitation for money, services, or anything of value. However, the lists and labels may be used for any political purpose. The county auditor or secretary of state must provide a copy of RCW 29A.08.740 to the person requesting the material that is released under this section.

(b) Disclosure of information on individuals under the age of 18 is subject to RCW 29A.08.725.

(4) For the purposes of this section, "political purpose" means a purpose concerned with the support of or opposition to any candidate for any partisan or nonpartisan office or concerned with the support of or opposition to any ballot proposition or issue. "Political purpose" includes, but is not limited to, such activities as the advertising for or against any candidate or ballot measure or the solicitation of financial support.

[ 2023 c 361 s 8. Prior: 2018 c 110 s 206; 2018 c 109 s 11; 2011 c 10 s 18; 2009 c 369 s 34; 2005 c 246 s 18; 2004 c 266 s 9; 2003 c 111 s 247; 1994 c 57 s 5; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 46 s 1; 1974 ex.s. c 127 s 2; 1973 1st ex.s. c 111 s 2; 1971 ex.s. c 202 s 3; 1965 ex.s. c 156 s 6. Formerly RCW 29.04.100.]

NOTES:

Short title—Findings—Intent—2018 c 110: See notes following RCW 29A.08.355.

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2018 c 109: See notes following RCW 29A.08.170.

Notice to registered poll voters—Elections by mail—2011 c 10: See note following RCW 29A.04.008.

Effective date—2005 c 246: See note following RCW 10.64.140.

Effective date—2004 c 266: See note following RCW 29A.04.575.

Severability—1994 c 57: See note following RCW 29A.16.040.

Forms, secretary of state to design—Availability to public: RCW 29A.08.850.